da: Farvekodesystem: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Andet
ja: カラーコードシステム: アンカー; コスモ; DMC; ジェントルアート; マデイラ; サリバンズ; ウィークスダイワークス; その他
cs: Systém kódování barev: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Ostatní
lt-LT: Spalvų kodų sistema: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Kita
pt-BR: Sistema de código de cores: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Outro
el: Σύστημα κωδικοποίησης με χρώματα: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Άλλο
it: sistema di codici colore: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Altro
vi: Hệ thống mã màu sắc: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Khác
pt-PT: Sistema de código de cor: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Outro
hu: Színkódrendszer: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Egyéb
sk-SK: Systém farebného kódovania: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Iné
nl: Kleurcodesysteem: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Overige
hr-HR: Sustav kodiranja boja: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Ostalo
zh-CN: 色标系统: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; 其他
ro-RO: Sistem de coduri de culori: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Altele
th: ระบบรหัสสี: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; อื่นๆ
nb: Fargekodesystem: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Annet
ru: Система цветовых кодов: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Другое
sl-SI: Sistem barvnih kod: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Drugo
es: Sistema de código de colores: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Otro
fr: Système de code couleur: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Autre
pl: System kodów kolorów: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Inny
en: Color code system: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Other
bg-BG: Система за цветови кодове.: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Друго
de: Farbcodesystem: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Sonstige
ko: 색상 코드 체계: 앵커; 코스모; DMC; 젠틀 아트; 마데이라; 설리반; 윅스 다이 웍스; 기타
tr: Renk kodu sistemi: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Diğer
sv: Färgkodssystem: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Övrigt
zh-TW: 色號系統: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; 其他
fi: Värikoodijärjestelmä: Anchor; Cosmo; DMC; Gentle Art; Madeira; Sullivans; Weeks Dye Works; Muu